Maryland, session 2025, HB1031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–839.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS UNDER INDIVIDUAL, GROUP, OR
BLANKET HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR
DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS UNDER INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP CONTRACTS
THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1031*

HOUSE BILL 1031
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
PRESCRIPTION WEIGHT LOSS DRUGS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE BEEN
DIAGNOSED WITH OBESITY AND AT LEAST ONE COMORBID MEDICAL CONDITION
THAT CAN BE TREATED WITH PRESCRIPTION WEIGHT LOSS DRUGS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.